Ohio, session 136, HB1015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.632 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.632. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the interchange of United States route number thirty-three and state route number sixty-six, in Auglaize county, shall be known as the "Sgt. Eli Holsinger Memorial Interchange." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers at the interchange indicating its name.